Illinois, session 104th, SB2248.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Innovations for Transportation 5Infrastructure Act is amended by changing Section 15 as 6follows: 7    (630 ILCS 10/15)8    (Section scheduled to be repealed on July 1, 2032)9    Sec. 15. Authorization of project delivery methods. 10    (a) Notwithstanding any other law, and as authority 11supplemental to its existing powers, except as otherwise 12provided for in this Act, the Transportation Agency, in 13accordance with this Act, may use the design-build project 14delivery method for transportation facilities if the capital 15costs for transportation facilities delivered utilizing the 16design-build project delivery method or Construction 17Manager/General Contractor project delivery method or 18Alternative Technical Concepts in a design-bid-build project 19delivery method do not: (i) for transportation facilities 20delivered by the Department, exceed the value of 20% $400 21million of the projects annually programmed in contracts 22awarded during the Department's multi-year highway improvement 23program on an annual basis for any 5-year period; or (ii) for   SB2248- 2 -LRB104 10936 LNS 21018 b1transportation facilities delivered by the Authority, exceed 220% of the Authority's annual improvement program. The 3Transportation Agency shall make this calculation before 4commencing the procurement. Notwithstanding any other law, and 5as authority supplemental to its existing powers, the 6Department, in accordance with this Act, may use the 7Construction Manager/General Contractor project delivery 8method for up to 2 transportation facilities per year. Before 9commencing a procurement under this Act for either a 10design-build contract or a Construction Manager/General 11Contractor contract, the Transportation Agency shall first 12undertake an analysis and make a written determination that it 13is in the best interests of this State to use the selected 14delivery method for that transportation facility. The analysis 15and determination shall discuss the design-build project 16delivery method or Construction Manager/General Contractor 17project delivery method's impact on the anticipated schedule, 18completion date, and project costs. The best interests of the 19State analysis shall be made available to the public.20    (b) The Transportation Agency shall report to the General 21Assembly annually for the first 5 years after June 15, 2022 22(the effective date of this Act) on the progress of 23procurements and transportation facilities procured under this 24Act.25    (c) A contract entered into pursuant to the provisions of 26this Act is excepted from the Public Contract Fraud Act.  SB2248- 3 -LRB104 10936 LNS 21018 b1(Source: P.A. 102-1094, eff. 6-15-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 3becoming law.